test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VW_waawaatesi_gt-norm.yaml
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niwaawaatesiinaanibanan
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niwaawaatesiinaanibanag
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niwaawaatesiinaanibaning
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niwaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niwaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niwaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niwaawaatesiiwaaibanan
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niwaawaatesiiwaaibanag
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niwaawaatesiiwaaibaning
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niwaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niwaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niwaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niwaawaatesiiniibanan
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niwaawaatesiiniibanag
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niwaawaatesiiniibaning
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niwaawaatesiini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niwaawaatesiini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1waawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niwaawaatesiini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giwaawaatesiinaanibanan
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giwaawaatesiinaanibanag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giwaawaatesiinaanibaning
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giwaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giwaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giwaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giwaawaatesiiwaaibanan
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giwaawaatesiiwaaibanag
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giwaawaatesiiwaaibaning
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giwaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giwaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giwaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giwaawaatesiiniibanan
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giwaawaatesiiniibanag
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giwaawaatesiiniibaning
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giwaawaatesiini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giwaawaatesiini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2waawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giwaawaatesiini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: owaawaatesiinaanibanan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: owaawaatesiinaanibanag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: owaawaatesiinaanibaning
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: owaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: owaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: owaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Obv: owaawaatesiiwaaibanan
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Pl: owaawaatesiiwaaibanag
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Loc: owaawaatesiiwaaibaning
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: owaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: owaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: owaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Obv: owaawaatesiiniibanan
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Pl: owaawaatesiiniibanag
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Loc: owaawaatesiiniibaning
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: owaawaatesiini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: owaawaatesiini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: owaawaatesiini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesiinaanibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesiinaanibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesiinaanibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesiinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesiiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesiiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesiiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesiiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesiiniibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesiiniibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesiiniibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesiini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesiini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesiini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: waawaatesiensimishinaan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: waawaatesiensimishiwaa
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: waawaatesiensimishini
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: waawaatesienhimishinaan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: waawaatesienhimishiwaa
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: waawaatesienhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: waawaatesiensimishiban
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: waawaatesiensimish***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: waawaatesienhimishiban
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: waawaatesienhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: waawaatesiensimishan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: waawaatesiensimishag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: waawaatesiensimishing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: waawaatesienhimishan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: waawaatesienhimishag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: waawaatesienhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: waawaatesiensiminaaniban
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waawaatesiensiminaan***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: waawaatesiensimiwaaiban
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: waawaatesiensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: waawaatesiensiminiiban
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: waawaatesiensimini***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: waawaatesienhiminaaniban
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waawaatesienhiminaan***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: waawaatesienhimiwaaiban
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: waawaatesienhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: waawaatesienhiminiiban
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: waawaatesienhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: waawaatesiensiminaanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: waawaatesiensiminaanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: waawaatesiensiminaaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: waawaatesiensimiwaaan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: waawaatesiensimiwaaag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: waawaatesiensimiwaaing
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: waawaatesiensiminian
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: waawaatesiensiminiag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: waawaatesiensiminiing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: waawaatesienhiminaanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: waawaatesienhiminaanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: waawaatesienhiminaaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: waawaatesienhimiwaaan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: waawaatesienhimiwaaag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: waawaatesienhimiwaaing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: waawaatesienhiminian
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: waawaatesienhiminiag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: waawaatesienhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensimibanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiensimibanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiensimibaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiensim***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiensim***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiensim***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: waawaatesienhimibanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: waawaatesienhimibanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: waawaatesienhimibaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesienhim***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesienhim***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesienhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: waawaatesiensishinaaniban
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waawaatesiensishinaan***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: waawaatesiensishiwaaiban
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: waawaatesiensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: waawaatesiensishiniiban
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: waawaatesiensishini***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: waawaatesienhishinaaniban
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waawaatesienhishinaan***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: waawaatesienhishiwaaiban
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: waawaatesienhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: waawaatesienhishiniiban
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: waawaatesienhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: waawaatesiensishinaanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: waawaatesiensishinaanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: waawaatesiensishinaaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: waawaatesiensishiwaaan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: waawaatesiensishiwaaag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: waawaatesiensishiwaaing
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: waawaatesiensishinian
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: waawaatesiensishiniag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: waawaatesiensishiniing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: waawaatesienhishinaanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: waawaatesienhishinaanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: waawaatesienhishinaaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: waawaatesienhishiwaaan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: waawaatesienhishiwaaag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: waawaatesienhishiwaaing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: waawaatesienhishinian
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: waawaatesienhishiniag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: waawaatesienhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensishibanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiensishibanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiensishibaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiensish***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiensish***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiensish***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: waawaatesienhishibanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: waawaatesienhishibanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: waawaatesienhishibaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesienhish***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesienhish***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesienhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensinaanibanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiensinaanibanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiensinaanibaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiensinaan***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensiwaaibanan
